Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.579

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Private or local government matching funding—School districts' ranked and prioritized list of projects.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) It is the intent of the legislature that state funds invested in the early learning facilities grant and loan program be matched by private or local government funding. Every effort shall be made to maximize funding available for early learning facilities from public schools, community colleges, education[al] service districts, local governments, and private funders.

(2) In the administration of the early learning facilities grant and loan program for eligible organizations, any nongovernmental private-public partnership that is certified by the community development financial institutions fund contracted with the department shall award grants or loans as described in RCW 43.31.577, that meet the criteria described in RCW 43.31.581, through an application process or in compliance with state and federal requirements of the funding source.

(3) In the administration of the early learning facilities grant and loan program for school districts, the department, in coordination with the office of the superintendent of public instruction, shall submit a ranked and prioritized list of proposed purchases and major construction or renovation of early learning facilities projects for school districts subject to the prioritization methodology described in RCW 43.31.581 to the office of financial management and the relevant legislative committees by December 15, 2017, and by September 15th of even-numbered years thereafter.

[2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.